Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2008
Construction program.

The construction program shall provide, in accordance with regulations prescribed under the federal act, for adequate hospital facilities for the people residing in this state and insofar as possible shall provide for their distribution throughout the state in such manner as to make all types of hospital and medical facility service reasonably accessible to all persons in the state.

Laws 1947, c. 232, § 8, p. 736;

Laws 1965, c. 421, § 6, p. 1351.